Utah statutes.
76-10-105.3.   Prohibition of sale or gift of clove cigarettes.
It is unlawful for any person to knowingly sell, offer for sale, give or
furnish any clove cigarette in this state.  For purposes of this section
"clove cigarette" means any cigarette which contains more than 10%, by weight,
of raw eugenia caryophyllata or caryophyllus, commonly known as clove.  Any
person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
